District of Columbia statutes.
11-1503

Designation of Chief Judge.

(a)

The chief judge of a District of Columbia court shall be designated by the President of the United States from among the judges of the court in regular active service, and shall serve for a term of four years or until a successor is designated. The chief judge shall be eligible for redesignation. The chief judge may relinquish that position, after giving notice to the President.

(b)

If a chief judge is not redesignated, or relinquishes the office of chief judge, that person shall continue as an associate judge.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 491, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(21), (22), 108 Stat. 713

Cross References

District Charter provisions relating to designation of chief judge of a District of Columbia court, see § 1-204.31.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1503.
1973 Ed., § 11-1503.